Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.070

Field investigations—Communication of site or resource location to department.

(1) It is the declared intention of the legislature that field investigations on privately owned lands should be conducted by professional archaeologists in accordance with both the provisions and spirit of this chapter. Persons having knowledge of the location of archaeological sites or resources are encouraged to communicate such information to the department. Such information shall not constitute a public record which requires disclosure pursuant to the exception authorized in chapter 42.56 RCW to avoid site depredation.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to allow trespassing on private property.

[ 2011 c 219 s 2. Prior: 2005 c 333 s 21; 2005 c 274 s 243; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 82 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 134 s 7.]